Maine, session 132, LD233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Biological males' participation in female athletic programs and activities at
schools that receive state funding
A school administrative unit or an elementary school, secondary school or
postsecondary educational institution in the State that receives any state funding may not
allow a person whose biological sex assigned at birth is male to participate in an athletic
program or activity that is designated for females.